Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20148-1104
Registration of securities; exceptions.

It shall be unlawful for any person to offer or sell any security in
this state unless (1) such security is registered by coordination
under section 8-1106 or
by qualification under section 8-1107, (2) the security is exempt under section
8-1110 or is sold in a transaction exempt under section 8-1111, or (3) the
security is a federal covered security.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 4, p. 1773;

Laws 1997, LB 335, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB214, § 2.

It is unlawful to offer or sell unregistered securities which are not exempt from registration or unless the securities are sold in an exempt transaction. Labenz v. Labenz, 198 Neb. 548, 253 N.W.2d 855 (1977).